Massachusetts, session 194th, H2004.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 272 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by adding the following section:-
Section 108. (a) For the purposes of this section, the term “child sex doll” shall mean an
anatomically correct doll, mannequin or robot, with the features of, or with features that
resemble those of, a minor, intended for use in sexual acts.
(b) Whoever knowingly uses, possesses, buys, sells, transports, delivers or distributes a
child sex doll in the commonwealth shall be fined not more than $10,000 or imprisoned not more
than 5 years, or both, for the first such offense and shall be fined not more than $10,000 or
imprisoned not more than 10 years, or both, for each such offense thereafter.
of 1